South Dakota, session 2026, SB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-20G:
On or before March first of each year, the department shall provide a report to the
legislature. The report must include, for the preceding calendar year:
(1) The expenses incurred and revenues generated from the medical cannabis
program;
(2) The impact of medical cannabis on public safety, public health, and on behavioral
health services; and
(3) The number of:
(a) Applications received by the department for registry identification cards;
(b) Cannabis-related poisonings;
(c) Drug-related deaths in which a toxicology screen detected metabolites;
(d) Hospitalizations in this state related to cannabis use;
(e) Licensing violations determined by the department;
(f) Medical cannabis establishments by type;
(g) Registered qualifying patients by medical condition;
(h) Practitioners, by specialty, who have provided written certifications;
(i) Qualifying patients and designated caregivers;
(j) Qualifying patient demographics by age and sex; and
(k) Registry identification cards revoked.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.